Utah statutes.
17-36-43.   Financial administration ordinance -- Purposes.

(1) (a)  On or before December 31, 2014, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is not subject to the provisions of this section; and

(b)  on or after January 1, 2015, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is subject to the provisions of this section.

(2)  The county legislative body, after consultation with the county auditor, may adopt a financial administration ordinance authorizing the county auditor, county executive, county manager, or, in the case of county operated hospitals or mental health districts, an appointed administrator, to act as the financial officer for the purpose of approving:

(a)  payroll checks, if the checks are prepared in accordance with a salary schedule established in a personnel ordinance or resolution; or

(b)  routine expenditures, such as utility bills, payroll-related expenses, supplies, materials, and payments on county-approved contracts and capital expenditures which are referenced in the budget document and approved by an appropriation resolution adopted for the current fiscal year.



Amended by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

